California, session 20252026, SB95.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 17550.1 of the Business and Professions Code is amended to read:17550.1. (a) “Seller of travel” means a person who sells, provides, furnishes, contracts for, arranges, or advertises that they can or may arrange, or has arranged, wholesale or retail, either of the following:(1) Air or sea transportation either separately or in conjunction with other travel services.(2) Land or water vessel transportation, other than sea carriage, either separately or in conjunction with other travel services if the total charge to the passenger exceeds three hundred dollars ($300).(b) “Seller of travel” includes a travel consolidator. “Travel consolidator” means an entity that purchases airline tickets in bulk from an airline and resells the tickets to travel agencies or directly to consumers tickets or vouchers for air transportation from an air carrier and resells the tickets or vouchers to travel agencies or directly to passengers at a discount. (c) Seller of travel does not include any of the following:(1) An air carrier.(2) An ocean carrier.(3) A hotel, motel, or similar lodging establishment where in the course of selling, providing, furnishing, contracting for, or arranging transient lodging accommodations and related services for its registered guests, it also arranges for transportation and does not directly or indirectly receive any money or other valuable consideration for arranging or providing that transportation.(4) A person or organization certified under Part 5 (commencing with Section 12140) of Division 2 of the Insurance Code, except such a person or organization shall comply with the registration and fee provisions of Sections 17550.20 and 17550.21 for each location at which air or sea transportation is sold either separately or in conjunction with other travel services.(5) A motor or rail carrier or water vessel operator holding the required permit, license, or other authority to operate from a state, federal, or other governmental entity.(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, a reference in this article or Article 2.7 (commencing with Section 17550.35) to air or sea transportation or to an air or sea carrier, includes land or water vessel transportation, as described in subdivision (a), and a motor carrier or water vessel operator.SEC. 2. Section 17550.31 is added to the Business and Professions Code, to read:17550.31. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, if a person who purchases air travel a ticket or voucher for air transportation is a victim of fraud committed by the seller of travel, the air carrier has actual knowledge of the fraud, seller of travel’s fraudulent business practice, and the person is unable to procure a refund from the seller of travel within a reasonable time, the air carrier shall refund the person. If the seller of travel is not registered pursuant to this article, the sale is voidable by the purchaser.(b) For purposes of this section:(1) “Fraud” means an act of deceit under Section 1710 of the Civil Code or an act proscribed under Section 1770 of the Civil Code.(2) “Actual knowledge of the seller of travel’s fraudulent business practice” means actual knowledge that the seller of travel is engaged in a course of conduct that violates Section 1710 or 1770 of the Civil Code.(c) If the plaintiff prevails in an action to enforce their rights under this section, the court shall award the plaintiff reasonable attorney’s fees and costs.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because the only costs that may be incurred by a local agency or school district will be incurred because this act creates a new crime or infraction, eliminates a crime or infraction, or changes the penalty for a crime or infraction, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code, or changes the definition of a crime within the meaning of Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution.